Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 15.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-115
Resignation of agent for service of
process.

(ULLCA
115) (a) To resign as an agent for service of process of a limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company, the agent must deliver to the
Secretary of State for filing a statement of resignation containing the company
name and stating that the agent is resigning.

(b) The Secretary of
State shall file a statement of resignation delivered under subsection (a)
of this section and mail or otherwise provide or deliver a copy to the designated
office of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company
and another copy to the principal office of the company if the mailing addresses
of the principal office appears in the records of the Secretary of State and
is different from the mailing address of the designated office.

(c) An agency for service
of process terminates on the earlier of:

(1) the thirty-first day after the Secretary of State
files the statement of resignation; or

(2) when a record designating a new agent for service
of process is delivered to the Secretary of State for filing on behalf of
the limited liability company and becomes effective.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 15.